Connecticut, session 2026, HB05579.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Special act 19-4 of the July special session is amended to
read as follows (Effective from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, the
Commissioner of Transportation shall convey to the town of Cheshire
three parcels of land located in the town of Cheshire at a cost equal to
the administrative costs of making such conveyance. The first parcel of
land has an area of approximately 3.59 acres and is identified as Lot 31
on town of Cheshire Tax Assessor's Map 4. The second parcel of land
has an area of approximately 0.88 acre and is identified as Lot 32 on
town of Cheshire Tax Assessor's Map 4. The third parcel of land has an
area of approximately 43.6 acres and is identified as Lot 33 on town of
Cheshire Tax Assessor's Map 4. The precise size and area of said parcels
to be conveyed shall be determined by the commissioner. The
conveyance of said parcels shall be subject to the approval of the State
Properties Review Board.
(b) The town of Cheshire shall sell said parcels of land for the
purposes of (1) economic development, [purposes] (2) the development

Substitute House Bill No. 5579
of a medical facility, (3) the development of housing, or (4) the
preservation of open space. If the town does not sell said parcels for
[economic development purposes within five years after the
conveyance] one or more of the purposes set forth in subdivisions (1) to
(4), inclusive, of this subsection before July 1, 2031, the parcels shall
revert to the state of Connecticut. Any sale of said parcels shall be made
at a cost equal to the fair market value of said parcels, as determined by
the average of the appraisals of two independent appraisers selected by
the commissioner. Such appraisals shall be completed not later than six
months after such conveyance and shall be updated as necessary. Any
funds received by the town of Cheshire from a sale in accordance with
this subsection shall be transferred to the State Treasurer for deposit in
the Special Transportation Fund.
(c) The State Properties Review Board shall complete its review of the
conveyance of said parcels of land not later than thirty days after it
receives a proposed agreement from the Department of Transportation.
The land shall remain under the care and control of said department
until a conveyance is made in accordance with the provisions of this
section. The State Treasurer shall execute and deliver any deed or
instrument necessary for a conveyance under this section, which deed
or instrument shall include provisions to carry out the purposes of
subsection (b) of this section. The commissioner shall have the sole
responsibility for all other incidents of such conveyance.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Special Act No. 26-20 2 of 2